District of Columbia statutes.
10-1141.02

Applicability.

Sections 10-1141.03 to 10-1141.05 shall not apply to:

(1)

The rental of:

(A)

Public space for use as a sidewalk cafe, enclosed flower or fruit stand, or for other retail purposes pursuant to §§ 10-1101.01 through 10-1102.02;

(B)

Space for a vault pursuant to §§ 10-1103.01 through 10-1104.01; or

(C)

Airspace for buildings, walkways, or other structures designed to be occupied by people on a regular basis, pursuant to subchapter II of this chapter; or

(2)

The occupation or use of public space or public streets by a vendor pursuant to a license to vend which has been issued to the vendor by the Mayor pursuant to Chapter 1A of Title 37 [§ 37-131.01 et seq.].

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-198, § 602, 43 DCR 4569
Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-71, § 12(b), 56 DCR 6619

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1072.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-71, in par. (2), substituted “by the Mayor pursuant to Chapter 1A of Title 37” for “pursuant to § 47-2834”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 11(b) of Extension of Time to Dispose of the Old Congress Heights School Temporary Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Law 17-172, June 5, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 7258).
Section 10(b) of D.C. Law 18-4 substituted “issued on or after March 19, 2008” for “pursuant to paragraph 36 of section 7 of An Act making appropriations for the fiscal year ending June thirtieth, nineteen hundred and three and for other purposes, approved July 1, 1902 (32 Stat. 627; D.C. Code § 47-2834)”.
Section 12(b) of D.C. Law 18-4 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Temporary Addition of Section

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-1141.01.

Emergency Legislation

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-1141.01.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 10(b) of Vending Regulation Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-322, March 19, 2008, 55 DCR 3445).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 10(b) of Vending Regulation Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-9, January 29, 2009, 56 DCR 1638).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 10(b) of Vending Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-47, April 27, 2009, 56 DCR 3574).